Hawaii statutes.
[§431:11-104.4] Competitive
standard. (a) The commissioner may enter an order under section
431:11-104.5 with respect to an acquisition if there is substantial evidence
that the effect of the acquisition may be to substantially lessen competition
in any line of insurance in this State, or tend to create a monopoly therein,
or if the insurer fails to file adequate information in compliance with section
431:11-104.3.

(b) In determining whether a proposed
acquisition would violate the competitive standard of subsection (a), the
commissioner shall consider the following:

(1) Any acquisition covered under section
431:11-104.2 involving two or more insurers competing in the same market is
prima facie evidence of violation of the competitive standards:

(A) If the market is highly concentrated and
the involved insurers possess the following shares of the market:

Insurer A Insurer B

4% 4% or more

10% 2% or more

15% 1% or more; or

(B) If the market is not highly concentrated
and the involved insurers possess the following shares of the market:

Insurer A Insurer B

5% 5% or more

10% 4% or more

15% 3% or more

19% 1% or more

A highly concentrated market is one in which
the share of the four largest insurers is seventy-five per cent or more of the
market. Percentages not shown in the tables shall be interpolated
proportionately to the percentages that are shown. If more than two insurers
are involved, exceeding the total of the two columns in the table is prima
facie evidence of violation of the competitive standard of subsection (a). For
the purpose of this paragraph, the insurer with the largest share of the market
shall be deemed to be insurer A;

(2) There is a significant trend toward increased
concentration when the aggregate market share of any grouping of the largest
insurers in the market, from the two largest to the eight largest, has
increased by seven per cent or more of the market over a period of time
extending from any base year five to ten years prior to the acquisition up to
the time of the acquisition. Any acquisition or merger covered under section
431:11-104.2 involving two or more insurers competing in the same market is
prima facie evidence of violation of the competitive standard in subsection (a)
if:

(A) There is a significant trend toward
increased concentration in the market;

(B) One of the insurers involved is one of the
insurers in a grouping of the large insurers showing the requisite increase in
the market share; and

(C) Another involved insurer's market is two
per cent or more;

(3) For the purposes of this subsection:

(A) The term "insurer" includes any
insurer or group of insurers under common management, ownership, or control;

(B) The term "market" means the
relevant product and geographical markets. In determining the relevant product
and geographical markets, the commissioner shall give due consideration to,
among other things, the definitions or guidelines, if any, promulgated by the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners, and to information, if any,
submitted by parties to the acquisition. In the absence of sufficient
information to the contrary, the relevant product market is assumed to be the
direct written insurance premiums for a line of business, the line being that
used in the annual statement required to be filed by insurers doing business in
this State, and the relevant geographical market is assumed to be this State;
and

(C) The burden of showing prima facie evidence
of violation of the competitive standard rests upon the commissioner; and

(4) Even though an acquisition is not prima facie
violative of the competitive standard under paragraph (1) or (2), the
commissioner may establish the requisite anticompetitive effect based upon
other substantial evidence. Even though an acquisition is prima facie
violative of the competitive standard under paragraph (1) or (2), a party may
establish the absence of the requisite anticompetitive effect based upon other
substantial evidence. Relevant factors in making a determination under this
paragraph include, but are not limited to, the following: market shares,
volatility of ranking of market leaders, number of competitors, concentration,
trend of concentration in the industry, and ease of entry and exit into the
market.

(c) An order may not be entered under section
431:11-104.5(a) if:

(1) The acquisition will yield substantial economies
of scale or economies in resource utilization that cannot be feasibly achieved
in any other way, and the public benefits which would arise from such economies
exceed the public benefits which would arise from not lessening competition; or

(2) The acquisition will substantially increase the
availability of insurance, and the public benefits of that increase exceed the
public benefits which would arise from not lessening competition. [L
1992, c 176, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next